fdic-to-hunspell/resultat/dictionaries.catalan.aff
FLAG long
# Model de conjugació: vestir
SFX 98 Y 101
SFX 98 r r/_C_Y ir
SFX 98 r nt/_C ir
SFX 98 r t/_V_Y ir
SFX 98 r da/_Y ir
SFX 98 r ts/_Y ir
SFX 98 r des/_Y ir
SFX 98 ir eixo/_Z ir
SFX 98 r sc/_Z ir
SFX 98 estir ist/_Z ir
SFX 98 ir esc/_Z ir
SFX 98 ir eixes/_Z ir
SFX 98 r xes/_Z ir
SFX 98 estir istes/_Z ir
SFX 98 ir eix/_Z ir
SFX 98 r x/_Z ir
SFX 98 estir ist/_Z ir
SFX 98 r m/_Z ir
SFX 98 r u/_Z ir
SFX 98 ir eixen/_Z ir
SFX 98 r xen/_Z ir
SFX 98 estir isten/_Z ir
SFX 98 r a/_Z ir
SFX 98 r es/_Z ir
SFX 98 r a/_Z ir
SFX 98 ir íem/_Z ir
SFX 98 ir íeu/_Z ir
SFX 98 r en/_Z ir
SFX 98 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 98 r res/_Z ir
SFX 98 ir í/_Z ir
SFX 98 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 98 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 98 r ren/_Z ir
SFX 98 r ré/_Z ir
SFX 98 r ràs/_Z ir
SFX 98 r rà/_Z ir
SFX 98 r rem/_Z ir
SFX 98 r reu/_Z ir
SFX 98 r ran/_Z ir
SFX 98 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 98 r ries/_Z ir
SFX 98 r ria/_Z ir
SFX 98 r ríem/_Z ir
SFX 98 r ríeu/_Z ir
SFX 98 r rien/_Z ir
SFX 98 ir esca/_Z ir
SFX 98 r sca/_Z ir
SFX 98 estir ista/_Z ir
SFX 98 ir esqui/_Z ir
SFX 98 ir eixi/_Z ir
SFX 98 ir esques/_Z ir
SFX 98 r sques/_Z ir
SFX 98 estir istes/_Z ir
SFX 98 ir esquis/_Z ir
SFX 98 ir eixis/_Z ir
SFX 98 ir esca/_Z ir
SFX 98 r sca/_Z ir
SFX 98 estir ista/_Z ir
SFX 98 ir esqui/_Z ir
SFX 98 ir eixi/_Z ir
SFX 98 r m/_Z ir
SFX 98 r guem/_Z ir
SFX 98 r u/_Z ir
SFX 98 r gueu/_Z ir
SFX 98 ir esquen/_Z ir
SFX 98 r squen/_Z ir
SFX 98 estir isten/_Z ir
SFX 98 ir esquin/_Z ir
SFX 98 ir eixin/_Z ir
SFX 98 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 98 r ra/_Z ir
SFX 98 r ssis/_Z ir
SFX 98 r res/_Z ir
SFX 98 r sses/_Z ir
SFX 98 ir ís/_Z ir
SFX 98 r ra/_Z ir
SFX 98 ir íssim/_Z ir
SFX 98 ir írem/_Z ir
SFX 98 ir íssem/_Z ir
SFX 98 ir íssiu/_Z ir
SFX 98 ir íreu/_Z ir
SFX 98 ir ísseu/_Z ir
SFX 98 r ssin/_Z ir
SFX 98 r ren/_Z ir
SFX 98 r ssen/_Z ir
SFX 98 ir eix/_C ir
SFX 98 r x/_C ir
SFX 98 estir ist/_C ir
SFX 98 ir esca/_D ir
SFX 98 r sca/_D ir
SFX 98 estir ista/_D ir
SFX 98 ir esqui/_D ir
SFX 98 ir eixi/_D ir
SFX 98 r m/_C ir
SFX 98 r guem/_C ir
SFX 98 r u/_C ir
SFX 98 ir esquen/_C ir
SFX 98 r squen/_C ir
SFX 98 estir isten/_C ir
SFX 98 ir esquin/_C ir
SFX 98 ir eixin/_C ir
# Model de conjugació: veure
SFX 99 Y 94
SFX 99 e e/_D_Y re
SFX 99 ure ient/_C re
SFX 99 ure ent/_C re
SFX 99 eure ist/_V_Y re
SFX 99 eure ista/_Y re
SFX 99 eure istos/_Y re
SFX 99 eure ists/_Y re
SFX 99 eure istes/_Y re
SFX 99 ure ig/_Z re
SFX 99 re s/_Z re
SFX 99 re 0/_Z re
SFX 99 ure iem/_Z re
SFX 99 ure em/_Z re
SFX 99 ure im/_Z re
SFX 99 ure ieu/_Z re
SFX 99 ure eu/_Z re
SFX 99 ure is/_Z re
SFX 99 re en/_Z re
SFX 99 ure ia/_Z re
SFX 99 ure ies/_Z re
SFX 99 ure ia/_Z re
SFX 99 eure èiem/_Z re
SFX 99 eure éiem/_Z re
SFX 99 eure èieu/_Z re
SFX 99 eure éieu/_Z re
SFX 99 ure ien/_Z re
SFX 99 eure iu/_Z re
SFX 99 ure ieres/_Z re
SFX 99 ure res/_Z re
SFX 99 ure ié/_Z re
SFX 99 eure éu/_Z re
SFX 99 ure iérem/_Z re
SFX 99 eure érem/_Z re
SFX 99 ure iéreu/_Z re
SFX 99 eure éreu/_Z re
SFX 99 ure ieren/_Z re
SFX 99 ure ren/_Z re
SFX 99 e é/_Z re
SFX 99 e às/_Z re
SFX 99 e à/_Z re
SFX 99 e em/_Z re
SFX 99 e eu/_Z re
SFX 99 e an/_Z re
SFX 99 e ia/_Z re
SFX 99 e ies/_Z re
SFX 99 e ia/_Z re
SFX 99 e íem/_Z re
SFX 99 e íeu/_Z re
SFX 99 e ien/_Z re
SFX 99 ure ja/_Z re
SFX 99 ure gi/_Z re
SFX 99 ure ges/_Z re
SFX 99 ure gis/_Z re
SFX 99 ure ja/_Z re
SFX 99 ure gi/_Z re
SFX 99 ure gem/_Z re
SFX 99 ure geu/_Z re
SFX 99 ure gen/_Z re
SFX 99 ure gin/_Z re
SFX 99 ure iés/_Z re
SFX 99 ure ra/_Z re
SFX 99 ure s/_Z re
SFX 99 ure iessis/_Z re
SFX 99 ure res/_Z re
SFX 99 ure ssis/_Z re
SFX 99 ure iesses/_Z re
SFX 99 ure iés/_Z re
SFX 99 ure ra/_Z re
SFX 99 ure s/_Z re
SFX 99 ure iéssim/_Z re
SFX 99 eure érem/_Z re
SFX 99 eure éssim/_Z re
SFX 99 ure iéssem/_Z re
SFX 99 ure iéssiu/_Z re
SFX 99 eure éreu/_Z re
SFX 99 eure éssiu/_Z re
SFX 99 ure iésseu/_Z re
SFX 99 ure iessin/_Z re
SFX 99 ure ren/_Z re
SFX 99 ure ssin/_Z re
SFX 99 ure iessen/_Z re
SFX 99 ure ges/_C re
SFX 99 ure s/_C re
SFX 99 ure t/_C re
SFX 99 ure ja/_D re
SFX 99 ure gi/_D re
SFX 99 ure gem/_C re
SFX 99 ure g/_C re
SFX 99 ure geu/_C re
SFX 99 ure ieu/_C re
SFX 99 ure eu/_C re
SFX 99 ure is/_C re
SFX 99 ure gen/_C re
SFX 99 ure gin/_C re
# Model de conjugació: voler
SFX 9A Y 80
SFX 9A r r/_C_Y er
SFX 9A r nt/_C er
SFX 9A er gut/_V_Y er
SFX 9A er guda/_Y er
SFX 9A er guts/_Y er
SFX 9A er gudes/_Y er
SFX 9A oler ull/_Z er
SFX 9A er s/_Z er
SFX 9A er 0/_Z er
SFX 9A r m/_Z er
SFX 9A r u/_Z er
SFX 9A r n/_Z er
SFX 9A er ia/_Z er
SFX 9A er ies/_Z er
SFX 9A er ia/_Z er
SFX 9A er íem/_Z er
SFX 9A er íeu/_Z er
SFX 9A er ien/_Z er
SFX 9A er guí/_Z er
SFX 9A er gueres/_Z er
SFX 9A er gué/_Z er
SFX 9A er guérem/_Z er
SFX 9A er guéreu/_Z er
SFX 9A er gueren/_Z er
SFX 9A er dré/_Z er
SFX 9A er dràs/_Z er
SFX 9A er drà/_Z er
SFX 9A er drem/_Z er
SFX 9A er dreu/_Z er
SFX 9A er dran/_Z er
SFX 9A er dria/_Z er
SFX 9A er dries/_Z er
SFX 9A er dria/_Z er
SFX 9A er dríem/_Z er
SFX 9A er dríeu/_Z er
SFX 9A er drien/_Z er
SFX 9A oler ulga/_Z er
SFX 9A oler ullga/_Z er
SFX 9A oler ulgui/_Z er
SFX 9A oler ulgues/_Z er
SFX 9A oler ullgues/_Z er
SFX 9A oler ulguis/_Z er
SFX 9A oler ulga/_Z er
SFX 9A oler ullga/_Z er
SFX 9A oler ulgui/_Z er
SFX 9A oler ulguem/_Z er
SFX 9A oler ullguem/_Z er
SFX 9A oler ulgueu/_Z er
SFX 9A oler ullgueu/_Z er
SFX 9A oler ulguen/_Z er
SFX 9A oler ullguen/_Z er
SFX 9A oler ulguin/_Z er
SFX 9A er gués/_Z er
SFX 9A er guera/_Z er
SFX 9A er guessis/_Z er
SFX 9A er gueres/_Z er
SFX 9A er guesses/_Z er
SFX 9A er gués/_Z er
SFX 9A er guera/_Z er
SFX 9A er guéssim/_Z er
SFX 9A er guérem/_Z er
SFX 9A er guéssem/_Z er
SFX 9A er guéssiu/_Z er
SFX 9A er guéreu/_Z er
SFX 9A er guésseu/_Z er
SFX 9A er guessin/_Z er
SFX 9A er gueren/_Z er
SFX 9A er guessen/_Z er
SFX 9A oler ulgues/_C er
SFX 9A oler ullgues/_C er
SFX 9A oler ulga/_D er
SFX 9A oler ullga/_D er
SFX 9A oler ulgui/_D er
SFX 9A oler ulguem/_C er
SFX 9A oler ullguem/_C er
SFX 9A oler ulgueu/_C er
SFX 9A oler ullgueu/_C er
SFX 9A oler ulguen/_C er
SFX 9A oler ullguen/_C er
SFX 9A oler ulguin/_C er
# Model de conjugació: vore
SFX 9B Y 13
SFX 9B e e/_D_Y re
SFX 9B e é/_Z re
SFX 9B e às/_Z re
SFX 9B e à/_Z re
SFX 9B e em/_Z re
SFX 9B e eu/_Z re
SFX 9B e an/_Z re
SFX 9B e ia/_Z re
SFX 9B e ies/_Z re
SFX 9B e ia/_Z re
SFX 9B e íem/_Z re
SFX 9B e íeu/_Z re
SFX 9B e ien/_Z re
